Hawaii statutes.
§671-17 Immunity of panel members from
liability. No member of a medical inquiry and conciliation panel shall be
liable in damages for libel, slander, or other defamation of character of any
party to a medical inquiry and conciliation panel proceeding for any action
taken or any decision, conclusion, finding, or recommendation made by the
member while acting within the member's capacity as a member of a medical
inquiry and conciliation panel under this part. [L 1976, c 219, pt of §2; gen
ch 1985; am L 2012, c 296, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next